src/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc
LEXICON abbr
+Abbr: # ;

LEXICON abbr.
!.+Abbr+Use/NG: # ;
abbr.sent ;

LEXICON abbr.sent
.+Abbr:. # ;
.+Abbr#.+SENT:. # ;

LEXICON Abbreviation
PS:PS abbr ;
тыс:тыс abbr. ;
лат:лат abbr. ;
в:в abbr. ;
вв:вв abbr. ;
мм:мм abbr. ;
км:км abbr. ;
кв:кв abbr. ; 
км²:км² abbr ;
км³:км³ abbr ;
г:г abbr. ;
гг:гг abbr. ;
млн:млн abbr. ;
руб:руб abbr. ;
млрд:млрд abbr. "weight: 0.9623851734150595" ;
напр:напр abbr. ;
см:см abbr. ;
св:св abbr. ; 
и% т.% п:и% т.% п abbr.sent ;
и% т.%п:и% т.%п abbr.sent ;
и% т.% д:и% т.% д abbr.sent ;
и% т.%д:и% т.%д abbr.sent ;
и% др:и% др abbr.sent ;
им:им abbr.sent ;
н.% э:н.% э abbr.sent ;
н.э:н.э abbr.sent ;
т.% е:т.% е abbr. ;
т.е:т.е abbr. ;
А:А abbr. ;
Б:Б abbr. ;
В:В abbr. ;
Г:Г abbr. ;
Д:Д abbr. ;
Е:Е abbr. ;
Ё:Ё abbr. ;
Ж:Ж abbr. ;
З:З abbr. ;
И:И abbr. ;
Й:Й abbr. ;
К:К abbr. ;
Л:Л abbr. ;
М:М abbr. ;
Н:Н abbr. ;
О:О abbr. ;
П:П abbr. ;
Р:Р abbr. ;
С:С abbr. ;
Т:Т abbr. ;
У:У abbr. ;
Ф:Ф abbr. ;
Х:Х abbr. ;
Ц:Ц abbr. ;
Ч:Ч abbr. ;
Ш:Ш abbr. ;
Щ:Щ abbr. ;
Ъ:Ъ abbr. ;
Ы:Ы abbr. ;
Ь:Ь abbr. ;
Э:Э abbr. ;
Ю:Ю abbr. ;
Я:Я abbr. ;
Дж:Дж abbr. ; 
°C:°C abbr ; 
°F:°F abbr ; 

№:№ abbr ;
№№:№№ abbr ;
\$:\$ abbr ;
\¢:\¢ abbr ;
\€:\€ abbr ;
\£:\£ abbr ;
\￡:\￡ abbr ;
\¥:\¥ abbr ;
\￥:\￥ abbr ;

!http\://:http\:// abbr ;
!https\://:https\:// abbr ;
